Nebraska, session 109, LB170.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB170 LB170
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-2704.24, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.24 (1) Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross
receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of and the storage, use, or
other consumption in this state of food or food ingredients except for
prepared food and food sold through vending machines.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) Alcoholic beverages means beverages that are suitable for human
consumption and contain one-half of one percent or more of alcohol by
volume;
(b) Candy means a preparation of sugar, honey, or other natural or
artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts, or
other ingredients or flavorings in the form of bars, drops, or pieces.
Candy does not include any preparation that contains flour or that
requires refrigeration;
(c) (b) Dietary supplement means any product, other than tobacco,
intended to supplement the diet that contains one or more of the
following dietary ingredients: (i) A vitamin, (ii) a mineral, (iii) an
herb or other botanical, (iv) an amino acid, (v) a dietary substance for
use by humans to supplement the diet by increasing the total dietary
intake, or (vi) a concentrate, metabolite, constituent, extract, or
combination of any ingredients described in subdivisions (2)(c)(i) (2)(b)
(i) through (v) of this section; that is intended for ingestion in
tablet, capsule, powder, softgel, gelcap, or liquid form or, if not
intended for ingestion in such a form, is not presented as conventional
food and is not represented for use as a sole item of a meal or of the
diet; and that is required to be labeled as a dietary supplement,
identifiable by the supplemental facts box found on the label and as
required pursuant to 21 C.F.R. 101.36, as such regulation existed on
January 1, 2003;
(d) (c) Food and food ingredients means substances, whether in
-2-

LB170 LB170
2025 2025
liquid, concentrated, solid, frozen, dried, or dehydrated form, that are
sold for ingestion or chewing by humans and are consumed for their taste
or nutritional value. Food and food ingredients does not include
alcoholic beverages, candy, dietary supplements, soft drinks, or tobacco;
(e) (d) Food sold through vending machines means food that is
dispensed from a machine or other mechanical device that accepts payment;
(f) (e) Prepared food means:
(i) Food sold with eating utensils provided by the seller, including
plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins, or straws. A plate
does not include a container or packaging used to transport the food; or
(ii) Two or more food ingredients mixed or combined by the seller
for sale as a single item and food sold in a heated state or heated by
the seller, except:
(A) Food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by the seller;
(B) Eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw animal
foods requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by the federal
Food and Drug Administration in chapter 3, part 401.11 of its Food Code,
as it existed on January 1, 2003, so as to prevent food borne illnesses;
(C) Food sold by a seller whose proper primary North American
Industry Classification System classification is manufacturing in sector
311, except subsector 3118, bakeries;
(D) Food sold in an unheated state by weight or volume as a single
item;
(E) Bakery items, including bread, rolls, buns, biscuits, bagels,
croissants, pastries, donuts, danish, cakes, tortes, pies, tarts,
muffins, bars, cookies, and tortillas; and
(F) Food that ordinarily requires additional cooking to finish the
product to its desired final condition; and
(g) Soft drinks means nonalcoholic beverages that contain natural or
artificial sweeteners. Soft drinks does not include beverages that
contain milk or milk products, soy, rice, or similar milk substitutes or
-3-

LB170 LB170
2025 2025
that contain greater than fifty percent of vegetable or fruit juice by
volume; and
(h) (f) Tobacco means cigarettes, cigars, chewing or pipe tobacco,
or any other item that contains tobacco.
Sec. 2. This act becomes operative on October 1, 2025.
Sec. 3. Original section 77-2704.24, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-4-